Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-624.01
Idle
reduction technology, defined.

Idle reduction technology
means any device or system of devices that is installed on a heavy-duty diesel-powered
on-highway truck or truck-tractor and is designed to provide to such truck
or truck-tractor those services, such as heat, air conditioning, or electricity,
that would otherwise require the operation of the main drive engine while
the truck or truck-tractor is temporarily parked or remains stationary.

Laws
2008, LB756, § 20.